Illinois, session 104th, SB2444.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Higher Education Act is amended by 5changing Section 5 and by adding Sections 19 and 20 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 167/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Contraception" means medication or medical devices used 9to prevent pregnancy. 10    "Emergency contraception" means medication approved by the 11federal Food and Drug Administration (FDA) that can 12significantly reduce the risk of pregnancy if taken within 72 13hours after unprotected sexual intercourse.14    "Governing board of each public institution of higher 15education" means the Board of Trustees of the University of 16Illinois, the Board of Trustees of Southern Illinois 17University, the Board of Trustees of Chicago State University, 18the Board of Trustees of Eastern Illinois University, the 19Board of Trustees of Governors State University, the Board of 20Trustees of Illinois State University, the Board of Trustees 21of Northeastern Illinois University, the Board of Trustees of 22Northern Illinois University, the Board of Trustees of Western 23Illinois University, the board of trustees of each community   SB2444- 2 -LRB104 12243 LNS 22350 b1college district in this State, and the governing board of any 2other public university, college, or community college now or 3hereafter established or authorized by the General Assembly.4    "Medication abortion" means termination of pregnancy by 5use of medication. 6    "Primary care services" has the meaning given to that term 7in Section 10 of the Equity and Representation in Health Care 8Act. 9    "Public institution of higher education" means the 10University of Illinois, Southern Illinois University, Chicago 11State University, Eastern Illinois University, Governors State 12University, Illinois State University, Northeastern Illinois 13University, Northern Illinois University, Western Illinois 14University, a public community college in this State, or any 15other public university, college, or community college now or 16hereafter established or authorized by the General Assembly.17    "Student health services" means any clinic, facility, or 18program operated by or affiliated with a public institution of 19higher education intending to provide primary care services to 20enrolled students of any State public institution of higher 21education.22    "Wellness kiosk" means a mechanical device used for retail 23sales of wellness products that may include, but is not 24limited to, prophylactics, menstrual cups, tampons, menstrual 25pads, pregnancy tests, and nonprescription drugs. A wellness 26kiosk must also include discounted emergency contraception.  SB2444- 3 -LRB104 12243 LNS 22350 b1(Source: P.A. 103-465, eff. 8-4-23.) 2    (110 ILCS 167/19 new)3    Sec. 19. Medication contraception availability on campus.4    (a) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, each public 5institution of higher education with student health services 6shall provide enrolled students with access to health care 7professionals authorized under State law to prescribe 8contraception. These health care professionals shall be 9available to discuss contraception options and prescribe 10contraception, as needed, including both medication and 11procedural based forms of contraception. This service shall be 12provided through: student health services; telehealth 13services; or other external licensed providers. This service 14shall be performed by providers who are licensed to prescribe 15and dispense contraception and may be performed by more than 16one provider.17    (b) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, if the 18public institution of higher education's student health 19services includes a pharmacy, the pharmacy on campus shall 20dispense contraception to enrolled students who wish to fill 21their prescriptions at the university pharmacy. The student 22may choose to fill the student's prescription at a third-party 23pharmacy.24    (c) Each public institution of higher education shall 25report annually to the Board of Higher Education that policies   SB2444- 4 -LRB104 12243 LNS 22350 b1under this Section have been adopted. This may be included in 2an existing report. The Board of Higher Education shall post 3to its website annually each public institution of higher 4education's compliance with the policies under this Section.  5    (110 ILCS 167/20 new)6    Sec. 20. Medication abortion availability on campus.7    (a) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, each public 8institution of higher education with student health services 9shall provide enrolled students with access to health care 10professionals authorized under State law to prescribe 11medication abortion. These health care professionals shall be 12available to discuss abortion options and prescribe medication 13abortion, as needed. This service shall be provided through: 14student health services; telehealth services; or other 15external licensed providers. This service shall be performed 16by providers who are licensed to prescribe and dispense 17medication abortion but need not be performed by one provider.18    (b) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, if the 19public institution of higher education's student health 20services includes a pharmacy, the pharmacy on campus shall 21dispense the medication abortion to enrolled students who wish 22to fill their prescriptions at the university pharmacy. The 23student may choose to fill the student's prescription at a 24third-party pharmacy.25    (c) A public institution of higher education that   SB2444- 5 -LRB104 12243 LNS 22350 b1dispenses medication abortion from the university pharmacy 2shall enter into a referral agreement with a tertiary care 3facility with obstetrics and gynecological services in the 4event of complication from medication abortion or suspected 5complicated pregnancy prior to dispensing medication abortion.6    (d) Each public institution of higher education shall 7report annually to the Board of Higher Education that policies 8under this Section have been adopted. This may be included in 9an existing report. The Board of Higher Education shall post 10to its website annually each public institution of higher 11education's compliance with the policies under this Section. 12    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 13severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.